Hawaii statutes.
[§173A-8] Development of land acquired by
the board. On the land acquired under this chapter the board may undertake
any development which is consistent with the land use law and all other laws
applicable to the land and development.

For purposes of this section,
"development" includes (1) any building or mining operation; (2) any
material change in use, intensity of use, or appearance of any structure or
land; or (3) the division of land into two or more parcels. [L 1973, c 77, §8]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next